Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-214 Extension; amendment. (a)
No certificate of authority shall contain an expiration date, but all
certificates of authority shall be extended by the commissioner from time to
time in order to continue to be valid. When the commissioner issues or extends
a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall determine the date prior to
which the certificate of authority must be extended and shall so notify the
insurer in writing. This date is called the extension date. The extension
date shall be any date not less than one year and not more than three years
after date of issue or extension of the certificate of authority. If the
insurer qualifies, its certificate of authority shall be extended. The
commissioner shall provide each holder of a certificate of authority at least
thirty days' advance written notice of the applicable extension date.

(b) The commissioner shall amend a certificate
of authority at any time in accordance with changes in the insurer's charter or
insuring powers. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 63, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next